Illinois, session 104th, HB5390.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fair Patient Billing Act is amended by 5changing Section 27 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 88/27)7    Sec. 27. Application procedures for financial assistance 8Procedures for Financial Assistance. 9    (a) Applications. The Attorney General shall, by rule, 10adopt standard provisions for a uniform financial assistance 11form to be included in all applications for financial 12assistance no later than June 30, 2013. On or before December 1331, 2026, interested stakeholders January 1, 2013, a statewide 14association representing a majority of hospitals may submit to 15the Attorney General recommendations concerning a uniform 16standard provisions to be used in an application for financial 17assistance, and the Attorney General shall take reasonably 18relevant those recommendations into account when adopting 19rules under this subsection.20    Approval of eligibility for financial assistance is valid 21for at least 12 months after the first service date for which 22the patient submitted a financial assistance application, 23pursuant to the hospital's financial assistance policy and   HB5390 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18752 BAB 32195 b1subject to subsection (b) of Section 45. A hospital must use 2only a uniform financial assistance form developed and 3provided by the Attorney General. 4    (b) Presumptive eligibility Eligibility. The Attorney 5General shall, by rule, adopt appropriate methodologies for 6the determination of presumptive eligibility no later than 7June 30, 2013. On or before January 1, 2013, a statewide 8association representing a majority of hospitals may submit to 9the Attorney General recommendations concerning those 10methodologies, and the Attorney General shall take those 11recommendations into account when adopting rules under this 12subsection. 13(Source: P.A. 97-690, eff. 6-14-12.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.